Hawaii statutes.
§560:3-721 Proceedings for review of
employment of agents and compensation of personal representatives and employees
of estate. After notice to all interested persons or on petition of an
interested person or on appropriate motion if administration is supervised, the
propriety of employment of any person by a personal representative including
any attorney, auditor, investment advisor or other specialized agent or
assistant, the reasonableness of the compensation of any person so employed, or
the reasonableness of the compensation determined by the personal
representative for the personal representative's own services, may be reviewed
by the court. Any person who has received excessive compensation from an
estate for services rendered may be ordered to make appropriate refunds. [L
1996, c 288, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next